Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-4703
Prosecutor's office; duties.

Each prosecutor's office shall undertake measures to maintain a searchable record of:

(1) Each case in which:

(a) Trial testimony is offered or provided by a jailhouse informant against a suspect's or defendant's interest; or

(b) A statement from a jailhouse informant against a suspect's or defendant's interest is used and a criminal conviction is obtained; and

(2) Any benefit requested by or offered or provided to a jailhouse informant in connection with such statement or trial testimony.

Laws 2019, LB352, § 3.